Missouri, session 2026, HB2080.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 30, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto three new sections, to be
known as sections 30.1025, 30.1027, and 30.1030, to read as follows:
30.1025. 1. As used in sections 30.1025 to 30.1030, the following terms mean:
(1) "Bitcoin", the decentralized digital asset created by a peer-to-peer network,
which operates with no central authority or banks;
(2) "Blockchain", data that is:
(a) Shared across a network to create a ledger of verified transactions or
information among network participants linked using cryptography to maintain the
integrity of the ledger and to execute other functions; and
(b) Distributed among network participants in an automated fashion to
concurrently update network participants on the state of the ledger and any other
functions;
(3) "Blockchain protocol", any executable software deployed to a blockchain
composed of source code that is publicly available and accessible including, but not
limited to, a smart contract or any network of smart contracts;
(4) "Cold storage", a method of storing private keys required to transact in
digital assets with a nexus to a secure physical location, protected from unauthorized
access and isolated from any network connections;
(5) "", a type of virtual currency that utilizes cryptography to secure
transactions that are digitally recorded on a distributed ledger, such as a blockchain.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2080 2
The term "cryptocurrency" includes Bitcoin, Solana, Ethereum, Ripple XRP, and
USDC (USD Coin);
(6) "Custody", the holding, safeguarding, and managing of digital assets by the
state treasury;
(7) "Digital asset", virtual currency, cryptocurrencies, natively electronic assets
including stablecoins and nonfungible tokens, and other digital-only assets that confer
economic, proprietary, or access rights or powers;
(8) "Donor", a Missouri resident who donates, bequests, or devises digital assets
to the cryptocurrency strategic reserve fund;
(9) "Node", a computational device that does any of the following:
(a) Communicates with other devices or participants on a blockchain to
maintain consensus and integrity of that blockchain;
(b) Creates and validates transaction blocks; or
(c) Contains and updates a copy of a blockchain.

A node does not exercise discretion over transactions initiated by the end user of the
blockchain protocol;
(10) "Stablecoin", a digital asset that:
(a) Is issued by a corporation;
(b) Is backed by dollars or high-quality liquid assets;
(c) Is redeemable on demand by the holder at par for United States dollars; and
(d) Has received appropriate regulatory approval from:
a. The United States of America; or
b. A state of the United States of America;
(11) "Staking", using a node to lock digital assets in order to operate the
consensus mechanism of a blockchain protocol.
2. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Cryptocurrency
Strategic Reserve Fund", which shall consist of moneys collected under this section.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and moneys in this fund shall be used solely as provided in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.

HCS HB 2080 3
(4) The state treasurer may accept gifts, grants, donations, bequests, or devises
of digital assets from eligible Missouri residents or a governmental entity.
3. The state treasurer shall store all digital assets collected under subsection 2 of
this section for a minimum of five years from the date that the digital asset enters the
state's custody. After this mandatory period, the digital assets may be transferred, sold,
appropriated, or converted to another digital asset or cryptocurrency as directed by the
state treasurer.
4. The state treasurer may engage in staking of qualifying digital assets if:
(1) The state treasurer's office retains legal ownership of the digital assets; and
(2) The staking is conducted using a third-party solution.
5. The state treasurer shall develop policies and protocols to ensure the secure
storage and protection of digital assets held in the fund, including the use of secure
custodial technologies, cold storage, and best practices in digital asset management.
6. The state treasurer shall prohibit digital asset transactions involving foreign
countries, entities or individuals outside of this state, or entities or individuals known to
engage in illegal activities.
7. The state treasurer may contract with a qualified, independent, United States-
based, third-party digital asset entity to assist in the creation, maintenance, operation,
and administration of the fund's security.
8. The state treasurer shall conduct regular audits of the reserve to ensure
transparency and security.
9. The state treasurer shall prepare a biennial report, to be published before
December thirty-first of each even-numbered year and made available on the state
treasurer's website. The state treasurer shall notify the general assembly when the
report is published. The report shall include:
(1) The total amount of digital assets held in the fund;
(2) The details of the equivalent value of the fund in United States dollars;
(3) The growth of the fund since the previous report;
(4) Any transactions or expenditures related to the fund since the previous
report;
(5) Any security threats the fund experienced since the previous report; and
(6) The amount of digital assets in the fund that, after the mandatory five-year
holding period, is eligible to be converted or transferred.
10. The state treasurer shall develop a straightforward process to facilitate
digital asset contributions from Missouri residents. The state treasurer may accept a
gift, grant, donation, bequest, or devise of digital assets from eligible Missouri residents.

HCS HB 2080 4
All digital asset contributions shall be held in the cryptocurrency strategic reserve fund
and managed in accordance with the provisions of subsection 3 of this section.
11. Upon request, the state treasurer shall issue a certificate of acknowledgment
to individuals or organizations that donate digital assets to the fund. The state treasurer
shall also establish a program to publicly honor significant contributions to the fund.
12. The state treasurer shall have the discretion to determine the eligibility of
donors. If the state treasurer determines that a donor is ineligible, the state treasurer
shall return the digital asset transferred to the fund.
100 13. The state treasurer shall have the authority to invest, purchase, and hold
101 digital assets using state funds.
102 14. The state treasurer may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for
103 the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined
104 in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
105 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
106 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
107 and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
108 review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
109 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
110 adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
30.1027. 1. All governmental entities shall accept digital assets, as approved by
the department of revenue, for the payment of any tax, fee, cost, charge, assessment,
fine, or other payment of expense owed to the governmental entity. The governmental
entity may require the payer to pay any service fees associated with the digital asset
transaction.
2. A person who owes any fees or tax obligations to a political subdivision or to
the state of Missouri shall use USDC or stablecoin that is equal to the value of the United
States dollar as the method of payment to satisfy the taxes or fees owed. After payment
of the fees and tax obligations, the balance amount may be converted to Ethereum,
Solana, Ripple XRP, USDC, or Bitcoin at the discretion of the state treasurer.
30.1030. 1. The state shall not prohibit an individual from:
(1) Operating a node for the purpose of connecting to a blockchain protocol or a
protocol built on top of a blockchain protocol and transferring digital assets on a
blockchain protocol; or
(2) Participating in staking on a blockchain protocol.
2. No business offering to provide staking services for individuals or to other
businesses shall be considered as offering a security or investment contract under state
law.

HCS HB 2080 5
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no individual or
entity shall face liability related to a specific transaction merely by validating such
transaction if such individual or entity provides staking services for individuals or other
businesses.
Section B. Section A of this act shall become effective only upon the passage and
approval by the voters of a constitutional amendment submitted to them by the general
assembly regarding the state treasurer's ability to invest in other reasonable and prudent
financial instruments and securities.
✔